src-fst-morphology-stems-exceptions.lexc.md
Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

The pair verb овны-вывны conjugates in more forms than are attested for 
the single verb вывны:

* овны-вывны examples:*
* *олан-вылан:* `овны-вывны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2`

### VERBS WITH FIRST PRETERITE THIRD PERSON WITHOUT с IN NORM 

### SPECIAL VERB FORM FOR VERBAL TERMINATIVE OF ЛОКНЫ 

### REDUPLICATED ADVERBS

### SUPERLATIVE ADVERBS

### SUPERLATIVE ADJECTIVES

### ADJECTIVES NOT YET ADDED TO DICTIONARY DATABANK

### VOCATIVE EXPRESSIONS

### PROPER NOUNS NOT YET ADDED TO DICTIONARY DATABANK

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-kpv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/exceptions.lexc)</small>

---
